Utah statutes.
72-4-203.   Utah National Parks Highway.
(1)  There is established the Utah National Parks Highway comprising the
existing highway from Route 89 at the Utah-Arizona border near Big Water
westerly on Route 89 to Route 9 near Mount Carmel Junction then westerly on
Route 9 to Route 17 near La Verkin then northerly on Route 17 to Interstate
Highway 15 then northerly on Interstate Highway 15 frontage roads, the
Veterans’ Memorial Highway, to Route 14 near Cedar City then southeasterly
on Route 14 to Route 148 near Cedar Breaks National Monument then northerly on
Route 148 to Route 143 near the north end of Cedar Breaks National Monument
then northeasterly on Route 143 to Route 89 near Panguitch then southerly on
Route 89 to Route 12 near Red Canyon then northeasterly on Route 12, the Clem
Church Memorial Highway, to Route 24 near Torrey then easterly on Route 24 to
Route 95 near Hanksville then southeasterly on Route 95, the Bicentennial
Highway, to Route 191 near Blanding then northerly on Route 191 to the
junction with Interstate Highway 70 near Crescent Junction.
(2)  In addition to other official designations, the Department of
Transportation shall designate and highlight the portions of the highways
identified in Subsection (1) as the Utah National Parks Highway on all future
state highway maps.
